Indiana, session 2026, HB1154.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 21-18-22 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 22. Hunger-Free Campus Grant Program
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "grant fund" refers to the
hunger-free campus grant fund established by section 5 of this
chapter.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "grant program" refers to the
hunger-free campus grant program established by section 4 of this
chapter.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "SNAP" refers to the
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program under IC 12-14-30.
Sec. 4. (a) The hunger-free campus grant program is established
to provide grants on a competitive basis to state educational
institutions for the purposes of:
(1) addressing student hunger;
(2) leveraging sustainable solutions to address the basic needs
2026 IN 1154—LS 6633/DI 152


of students at state educational institutions;
(3) raising awareness of the basic needs services offered at
state educational institutions; and
(4) building strategic partnerships at the local, state, and
national levels to address food insecurity among students at
postsecondary educational institutions.
(b) The commission shall administer the grant program.
Sec. 5. (a) The hunger-free campus grant fund is established for
the purpose of providing grants to state educational institutions
under the grant program.
(b) The commission shall administer the grant fund.
(c) The grant fund consists of:
(1) money appropriated to the grant fund by the general
assembly;
(2) money transferred to the grant fund by the commission;
and
(3) gifts, grants, devises, bequests, and other donations made
to the grant fund.
(d) The expenses of administering the grant fund shall be paid
from money in the grant fund.
(e) Money in the grant fund at the end of a state fiscal year does
not revert to the state general fund but remains available to be:
(1) used for the purposes of the grant program; or
(2) transferred by the commission to another fund
administered by the commission.
Sec. 6. (a) To the extent that sufficient money is available in the
grant fund, the commission shall provide a grant from the grant
fund to a state educational institution if the commission designates
at least one (1) campus of the state educational institution as a
hunger-free campus.
(b) A campus of a state educational institution that meets the
following requirements may be designated by the commission as a
hunger-free campus:
(1) The campus establishes a hunger task force that:
(A) includes student representatives from the student body
of the campus;
(B) meets at least three (3) times each academic year; and
(C) sets at least two (2) goals with action plans in
furtherance of the purposes described in section 4(a) of this
chapter.
(2) The campus designates a member of the campus's staff to
be responsible for providing students with information
2026 IN 1154—LS 6633/DI 152


regarding enrollment in SNAP.
(3) The campus:
(A) allows students to use SNAP benefits at campus stores;
or
(B) provides students with information regarding
establishments in the surrounding area at which students
can use SNAP electronic benefits transfers.
(4) The campus holds an awareness day campaign activity or
event during the national hunger and homelessness awareness
week.
(5) The campus:
(A) provides at least one (1) physical food pantry on
campus; or
(B) enables students to receive food through a separate,
stigma-free arrangement.
(6) The campus:
(A) develops a student meal credit donation program; or
(B) allocates a designated amount of funds for free food
vouchers for students.
(7) The campus biannually:
(A) conducts a student survey on hunger developed by the
commission; and
(B) submits:
(i) the results of the survey; and
(ii) a best practices campus profile;
to the commission at a time prescribed by the commission.
(c) The commission shall determine the amount of a grant
provided to a state educational institution under this section.
(d) The commission shall give priority to a state educational
institution where a larger proportion of the state educational
institution's student body is receiving a Pell grant when providing
a grant under this section.
(e) A state educational institution that receives a grant under
this section shall:
(1) use the grant funds for the purposes described in section
4(a) of this chapter; and
(2) report to the commission, in the manner and on the
schedule prescribed by the commission, the purposes for
which the grant funds were used and the results obtained by
the state educational institution as a result of the state
educational institution's use of the grant funds.
(f) A state educational institution may partner with a local food
2026 IN 1154—LS 6633/DI 152


bank or food pantry to meet the requirement under subsection
(b)(5).
(g) In the development of the survey under subsection (b)(7), the
commission shall use any existing surveys designed to collect
information regarding food insecurity among students enrolled in
state educational institutions.
(h) The commission shall use the results of the survey under
subsection (b)(7) to compile and publish on the commission's
website a comparative profile of each campus designated as a
hunger-free campus.
Sec. 7. (a) Not later than July 1, 2029, the commission shall
submit to the governor, the president pro tempore of the senate,
and the speaker of the house of representatives a report regarding
the grant program that includes:
(1) the number of grants awarded under the grant program
and the amount of each grant;
(2) a description of the effect the grant program has had on
establishing additional hunger-free campuses at state
educational institutions and reducing the number of students
at state educational institutions experiencing food insecurity;
and
(3) the commission's recommendations regarding the
potential establishment of an annual appropriation for the
grant program.
(b) A report submitted to the president pro tempore of the
senate and the speaker of the house of representatives must be in
an electronic format under IC 5-14-6.
Sec. 8. The commission shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to
carry out this chapter.
Sec. 9. (a) The commission shall transfer:
(1) one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) from the funds
appropriated to the commission for the state fiscal year
beginning July 1, 2027, and ending June 30, 2028; and
(2) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) from the
funds appropriated to the commission for the state fiscal year
beginning July 1, 2028, and ending June 30, 2029;
to the grant fund for the purpose of providing grants under this
chapter.
(b) This section expires December 31, 2029.
SECTION 2. [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026] (a) There is
appropriated from the state general fund to the hunger-free
campus grant fund established by IC 21-18-22-5, as added by this
2026 IN 1154—LS 6633/DI 152


act, two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) for the state
fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, for
use by the commission for higher education in providing grants
under IC 21-18-22, as added by this act.
(b) This SECTION expires December 31, 2027.
2026 IN 1154—LS 6633/DI 152